Maine, session 132, LD1249.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §850-B, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7, is
amended to read:
The paid family and medical leave benefits program is established effective January 1,
2026 July 1, 2027. The program is administered by the department. In accordance with
subsection 1, the department may, through contract after a competitive bidding process
subject to the requirements of Title 5, section 1816‑B, authorize a 3rd party to conduct
claims administration.
Sec. 2. 26 MRSA §850-E, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7, is
amended to read:
6. Report. Beginning October 1, 2026 April 1, 2028 and annually thereafter, the
administrator shall publish a report providing the following information concerning the
program for the previous fiscal year:
A. The total claims made, the total eligible claims and the percentage of total eligible
claims out of total claims made;
B. The percentage of eligible claims attributable to medical leave;
C. The percentage of eligible claims attributable to family leave for the serious health
condition of a family member;
D. The percentage of eligible claims attributable to family leave other than for the
birth, adoption or fostering of a child;
E. The percentage of eligible claims attributable to family leave for the birth, adoption
or fostering of a child;
F. The percentage of eligible claims attributable to family leave for a qualifying
exigency;
G. The percentage of eligible claims attributable to family leave for a covered service
member;
H. The claimant demographics by age, gender identification, race, ethnicity, average
weekly wage, occupation and the type of leave taken;
I. The percentage of claims denied and the reasons for the denials;
Page 1 - 132LR0756(01)

J. The average weekly benefit amount paid for all claims and by the type of leave
taken;
K. The category of family member for whom family medical leave was taken to care
for the family member’s serious medical condition;
L. The time for initial claims processing and determination;
M. The average length of time between an application and receipt of benefits;
N. The average leave duration for each purpose of leave; and
O. Any changes in gross benefits paid compared to the previous fiscal year.
The administrator shall submit the annual report required by this subsection to the
department, the authority and the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over labor matters.
Sec. 3. 26 MRSA §850-P, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7, is amended
to read:
§850-P. Implementation
Contributions must begin January 1, 2025 to provide funds for the fund. The
administrator shall begin processing claims on May 1, 2026 November 1, 2027, except that,
by February 1, 2026 August 1, 2027, the authority shall conduct an actuarial study to ensure
the solvency of the fund in order to begin processing claims on May November 1st. If
additional contributions are required based on the results of the actuarial study, the
authority, through a majority vote, may require a one-time suspension of claims payments
of no longer than 3 months.
The administrator shall establish reasonable procedures and forms for filing claims for
benefits under this subchapter and shall specify what supporting documentation is
necessary to support a claim for benefits, including documentation required from a health
care provider for proof of a serious health condition.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.